Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1614
Appeal; hearing; management office; duties.

In any appeal filed pursuant to section 70-1612, the management office designated by the utility shall notify the domestic subscriber of the time, place, and date scheduled for such hearing. The notice requirements, hearing procedures, and other rights of domestic subscribers shall be set forth in the procedures established under sections 70-1612 and 70-1613.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2714;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 14.